Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.14 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Closed-loop cooling system" means a cooling system that
recirculates water or other coolant within a contained system and
does not rely upon once-through cooling or continuous withdrawal and

Req. No. 16874 Page 1

disc harge of water from a natural water source, except for de
minimis make-up water necessary for system efficiency and safety;
2. "Large load customer" means a customer or group of
affiliated customers that:
a. is served by an electric utility subject to the
jurisdiction of the Oklahoma Corporation Commission,
b. has a single-site or aggregated load with a maximum
demand of fifty (50) megawatts or greater, or such
other threshold as may be established by rule of the
Commission,
c. is primarily engaged in one or more of the following
activities:
(1) operation of data centers, cloud computing
facilities, server farms, or digital asset
processing facilities,
(2) artificial intelligence, high-performance
computing, or large-scale information processing,
or
(3) advanced manufacturing, industrial processing, or
other operations requiring continuous or near-
continuous high electric demand; and
d. operates facilities under common ownership or control
that are reasonably expected to operate in a
coordinated manner or that collectively impose
Req. No. 16874 Page 2

comparable impacts on electric infrastructure or
rates. The term shall not include traditional
residential, small commercial, or standard industrial
customers unless such customers meet the demand
thresholds established in this section.
B. Any large load customer, as defined in this section, that is
constructed on or after the effective date of this act, shall
utilize a closed-loop cooling system for all data center, cloud
computing, industrial processing, or other high-demand facility
operations requiring process or mechanical cooling.
C. The Commission may promulgate rules necessary to implement
and enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16874 JBH 03/03/26









Req. No. 16874 Page 3